Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.380 and 2019 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall exempt the following students from the payment of all tuition fees and services and activities fees:(((1)))(a) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption only if they begin their course of study at a state-supported college or university within ((ten))10 years of their graduation from high school; ((and(2)))(b) Children of a parent who was a victim of a homicide, who were a resident of the state at the time the homicide of the parent occurred, and who were subsequently subject to a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption at a state-supported college or university for a total of six academic years. For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), homicide has the same meaning as defined in RCW 9A.32.010; and(c) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency.(((3)))(2) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall report to the education data center on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under this section. The education data center shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.(((4)))(3) As used in this section, "transportation agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government in this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the construction and maintenance of the highways and roads within the state of Washington. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a transit agency having as one of its functions the highway maintenance((,)) including, but not limited to, the state department of transportation. A transportation agency under this section does not include a government contractor.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.520 and 2015 c 55 s 217 are each amended to read as follows:Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the community and technical colleges:(1) May waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and activities fees for students ((nineteen))19 years of age or older who are eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through 28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate, but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405;(2)(a) Shall waive all of tuition fees and services and activities fees for:(i) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a community or technical college within ((ten))10 years of their graduation from high school; ((and))(ii) Children of a parent who was a victim of a homicide, who were a resident of the state at the time the homicide of the parent occurred, and who were subsequently subject to a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption at a state-supported college or university for a total of six academic years. For purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(ii), homicide has the same meaning as defined in RCW 9A.32.010; and(iii) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state.(b) For the purposes of this section, "totally disabled" means a person who has become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or gainful pursuit.(c) The governing boards of the community and technical colleges shall report to the state board for community and technical colleges on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under (a) of this subsection. The state board for community and technical colleges shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and(3) May waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for:(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community or technical college course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405. The waiver shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school diploma or certificate; and(b) Up to ((forty))40 percent of the students enrolled in the regional education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall study the impact on children whose parent was a victim of a homicide and were subsequently subject to a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW. The study must explore the following for children whose parent was a victim of homicide, before and after the enactment of the tuition waiver established in this act:(a) Educational outcomes, including enrollment and persistence;(b) Health outcomes; and(c) Incidents with the law.(2) The Washington state institute for public policy shall complete the final report that evaluates the effect of tuition waivers for the impacted children by December 1, 2035. A preliminary report, which may provide any issues with data collection, is due by December 1, 2031.(3) This section expires July 1, 2036.--- END ---